Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1598.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "regulation" in section 3 of the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the 123456789101112131415161718192021 meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Economically significant regulation." A regulation that, if promulgated and implemented, may reasonably be expected to result in direct or indirect cost to the Commonwealth, to its political subdivisions and to the private sector in excess of $1,000,000 on an annual basis.* * *"Legislative day." A day when both houses of the General Assembly are in voting session.* * *"Regulation." Any rule or regulation, or order in the nature of a rule or regulation, promulgated or permit issued by an agency under statutory authority in the administration of any statute administered by or relating to the agency or amending, revising or otherwise altering the terms and provisions of an existing regulation or permit, or prescribing the practice or procedure before such agency. The term shall also include actions of the Liquor Control Board which have an effect on the discount rate for retail licensees. The term shall not include a proclamation, executive order, directive or similar document issued by the Governor, but shall include a regulation which may be promulgated by an agency, only with the approval of the Governor.* * *Section 2. Section 5(a)(1.1) and (4) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 5. Proposed regulations; procedures for review.(a) On the same date that an agency submits a proposed regulation to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication 20250HB1598PN1911 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of notice of proposed rulemaking in the Pennsylvania Bulletin as required by the Commonwealth Documents Law, the agency shall submit to the commission and the committees a copy of the proposed regulation and a regulatory analysis form which includes the following:* * *(1.1) A specific citation to the Federal or State statutory or regulatory authority or the decision of a Federal or State court under which the agency is proposing the regulation, which the regulation is designed to implement or which may mandate or affect compliance with the regulation. In the case of a citation of State statutory authority, the citation must be to a provision of the statute that explicitly states that the agency may promulgate regulations for the specific purpose cited in the statement of need for the regulation under paragraph (3).* * *(4) Estimates of the direct and indirect costs to the Commonwealth, to its political subdivisions and to the private sector. [Insofar as the proposed regulation relates to costs to the Commonwealth, the agency may submit in lieu of its own statement the fiscal note prepared by the Office of the Budget pursuant to section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as "The Administrative Code of 1929."] The estimates shall be prepared by the Independent Fiscal Office and submitted to the agency for inclusion in the regulatory analysis form and shall include an estimate of the annual costs to be used to determine whether the regulation is an economically significant regulation.* * *20250HB1598PN1911 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d.1) The committees shall, during the public comment period, conduct a public hearing to receive comments regarding a proposed economically significant regulation. The agency shall appear at the hearing if requested to do so by the chair of the committee.* * *(i) All forms required for implementation of a regulation must be included with the regulatory analysis form when submitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau, the committees and the commission under subsection (a).(j) The commission shall transmit comments regarding the cost estimates required under subsection (a)(4) to the Independent Fiscal Office for review.Section 3. Section 5.1(e), (j.2), (j.3) and (l) of the act are amended to read:Section 5.1. Final-form regulations and final-omitted regulations; procedures for review.* * *(e) The commission may have until its next scheduled meeting which occurs no less than 30 days after receipt of the final-form or final-omitted regulation to approve or disapprove the final-form or final-omitted regulation. Notwithstanding subsections (j.1) and (j.2), at any time prior to 24 hours before the commission's meeting to consider a regulation, a committee may notify the commission and the agency that the committee disapproves or intends to further review the final-form regulation. If notified by a committee that the committee disapproves of a regulation, the commission may not approve or disapprove the regulation for a period of 30 days or nine legislative days, whichever is longer. If notified by a 20250HB1598PN1911 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 committee that the committee intends to further review a final-form regulation, the commission may not approve or disapprove the regulation for a period of 14 days or six legislative days, whichever is longer. The commission shall notify the agency and the committees of its approval or disapproval. If the commission does not disapprove the final-form or final-omitted regulation within the time allotted in this subsection, the commission shall be deemed to have approved the final-form or final-omitted regulation.* * *(j.2) (1) At any time during the commission's review period up to 24 hours prior to the opening of the commission's public meeting, a committee may notify the commission and the agency that it has approved or disapproved a final-form or final-omitted regulation or that it intends to review the regulation.(2) If the commission approves a regulation and a committee has not notified the commission and the agency that it has disapproved the regulation or that it intends to review the regulation, the agency may promulgate the regulation. If the commission approves a regulation and a committee has notified the commission and the agency that it has disapproved the regulation or that it intends to review the regulation, the agency may not promulgate the regulation for 14 days or six legislative days, whichever is longer, after the committee has received the commission's approval order.(3) During [this 14-day period] the period established under paragraph (2), the committee may take action on the regulation pursuant to section 7(d). If at the expiration of 20250HB1598PN1911 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the [14-day] period established under paragraph (2) the committee has not taken action on the regulation pursuant to section 7(d), the agency may promulgate the regulation.(j.3) If the committees are prevented from completing their [14-day] review during the period established under subsection (j.2)(2) because of adjournment sine die or expiration of the legislative session in an even-numbered year, their review of the final-form or final-omitted regulation shall automatically be suspended until the fourth Monday in January of the next year. On that date, the agency shall resubmit the final-form or final-omitted regulation and required material to the committees and the commission. If either committee has not been designated by the fourth Monday in January, the agency may not deliver the final-form or final-omitted regulation and required material to the committees and the commission until both committees are designated. If the agency does not deliver the final-form or final-omitted regulation and required material to the commission and the committees by the second Monday after the date by which both committee designations have been published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin, the agency shall be deemed to have withdrawn the final-form or final-omitted regulation. In determining the remaining time for committee review, the number of days in which the committees have had the final-form or the final-omitted regulation under review as of the adjournment sine die or expiration of the prior session shall be subtracted from the [14-day] committee review period established under subsection (j.2)(2), but the committee review period in the next succeeding legislative session shall not be less than ten days. An agency may not submit a final-form or final-omitted regulation to the commission or the committees for review during 20250HB1598PN1911 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the period from the adjournment sine die or expiration of the legislative session of an even-numbered year to the date by which both committees have been designated in the next succeeding legislative session. This subsection shall not apply to emergency-certified regulations adopted pursuant to the provisions of section 6(d).* * *(l) Except for emergency-certified regulations adopted under section 6(d), an agency may not promulgate a regulation until completion of the review provided for in this act[.] and, if the regulation is an economically significant regulation, the General Assembly adopts a resolution under section 7.2 and the Governor signs the resolution.Section 4. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 5.3. Regulations deemed withdrawn.A regulation shall be deemed withdrawn if there is no provision of a State statute which explicitly states that the agency may promulgate regulations for the specific purpose cited in the statement of need for the regulation under section 5(a)(3) and the regulatory analysis form submitted for the regulation does not comply with the requirements of section 5(a)(1.1).Section 5. Section 7(d) of the act is amended to read:Section 7. Procedures for subsequent review of disapproved final-form or final-omitted regulations.* * *(d) Upon receipt of the commission's order pursuant to subsection (c.1) or at the expiration of the commission's review period if the commission does not act on the regulation or does not deliver its order pursuant to subsection (c.1), [one] the 20250HB1598PN1911 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following apply:(1) One or both of the committees may, within 14 calendar days or six legislative days, whichever is longer, report to the House of Representatives or Senate a concurrent resolution and notify the agency. During the [14-calendar-day] period specified in this paragraph, the agency may not promulgate the final-form or final-omitted regulation. If, by the expiration of the [14-calendar-day] period specified in this paragraph, neither committee reports a concurrent resolution, the committees shall be deemed to have approved the final-form or final-omitted regulation, and the agency may promulgate that regulation.(2) If either committee reports a concurrent resolution before the expiration of the [14-day] period specified in paragraph (1), the [Senate and the House of Representatives] chamber to which the concurrent resolution is reported shall [each] have 30 calendar days or ten legislative days, whichever is longer, from the date on which the concurrent resolution has been reported, to adopt the concurrent resolution[.] and transmit it to the other chamber. The other chamber shall have 30 calendar days or ten legislative days, whichever is longer, from the date on which the concurrent resolution has been transmitted, to adopt the concurrent resolution.(3) If the General Assembly adopts the concurrent resolution by majority vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives within 60 calendar days or 20 legislative days, whichever is longer, from the date on which a concurrent resolution has been reported out by a committee, the concurrent resolution shall be presented to the Governor 20250HB1598PN1911 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in accordance with section 9 of Article III of the Constitution of Pennsylvania.(4) If the Governor does not return the concurrent resolution to the General Assembly within ten calendar days after it is presented, the Governor shall be deemed to have approved the concurrent resolution.(5) If the Governor vetoes the concurrent resolution, the General Assembly may override that veto by a two-thirds vote in each house. The Senate and the House of Representatives shall each have 30 calendar days or ten legislative days, whichever is longer, to override the veto. If the General Assembly does not adopt the concurrent resolution or override the veto in the time prescribed in this [subsection] paragraph, it shall be deemed to have approved the final-form or final-omitted regulation.(6) Notice as to any final disposition of a concurrent resolution considered in accordance with this [section] subsection shall be published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(7) The bar on promulgation of the final-form or final-omitted regulation shall continue until that regulation has been approved or deemed approved in accordance with this subsection.(8) If the General Assembly adopts the concurrent resolution and the Governor approves or is deemed to have approved the concurrent resolution or if the General Assembly overrides the Governor's veto of the concurrent resolution, the agency shall be barred from promulgating the final-form or final-omitted regulation.(9) If the General Assembly does not adopt the concurrent resolution or if the Governor vetoes the 20250HB1598PN1911 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 concurrent resolution and the General Assembly does not override the Governor's veto, the agency may promulgate the final-form or final-omitted regulation.(10) The General Assembly may, at its discretion, adopt a concurrent resolution disapproving the final-form or final-omitted regulation to indicate the intent of the General Assembly but permit the agency to promulgate that regulation.Section 6. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 7.2. Concurrent resolution required for economically significant regulations.(a) If the commission issues an order to approve a final-form regulation or final-omitted regulation that is an economically significant regulation or if the agency decides to proceed with a final-form regulation or final-omitted regulation that is an economically significant regulation for which the commission issued a disapproval order , the agency shall submit a copy of the order and, if applicable, the agency's response to the Senate and the House of Representatives and shall request a concurrent resolution approving the regulation. The concurrent resolution shall be referred to the applicable standing committee of the Senate and the applicable standing committee of the House of Representatives. A concurrent resolution that is reported from the standing committee of the Senate shall be placed on the Senate calendar. A concurrent resolution that is reported from the standing committee of the House of Representatives shall be placed on the House calendar. The Senate and the House of Representatives shall each have 30 calendar days or ten legislative days, whichever is longer, from the date on which the agency requested the concurrent resolution to consider the concurrent resolution . If the General Assembly 20250HB1598PN1911 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 does not adopt the concurrent resolution in the time prescribed in this subsection, the final-form regulation or final-omitted regulation shall be deemed not approved and the regulation shall not take effect.(b) This section shall not apply to emergency-certified regulations adopted under section 6(d).Section 7. This act shall apply to any regulation prepared in final form on or after the effective date of this section.Section 8. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1598PN1911 - 11 - 123456789